Utah statutes.
13-47-202.   Liability protections.

(1)  A private employer may not be held civilly liable under state law in a cause of action for the private employer's unlawful hiring of an unauthorized alien, as defined in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a, if:

(a)  the private employer complies with Section 13-47-201; and

(b)  the information obtained in accordance with the status verification system indicated that the employee's federal legal status allowed the private employer to hire the employee.

(2)  A private employer may not be held civilly liable under state law in a cause of action for the private employer's refusal to hire an individual if:

(a)  the private employer complies with Section 13-47-201; and

(b)  the information obtained in accordance with the status system verification indicated that the individual's federal legal status was that of an unauthorized alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324a.

